Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF217.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1953XS (1) 91 jda/jh S.F. 217 Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph o, Code 1 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 2 Sec. 2. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 3 by adding the following new paragraph: 4 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0t. Be subject to and comply with the 5 requirements of section 280.36 relating to the administration 6 of the Iowa youth survey in the same manner as a school 7 district. 8 Sec. 3. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, paragraph m, Code 9 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 10 Sec. 4. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 11 by adding the following new paragraph: 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . r. Be subject to and comply with the 13 requirements of section 280.36 relating to the administration 14 of the Iowa youth survey in the same manner as a school 15 district. 16 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 280.36 Iowa youth survey. 17 The board of directors of each school district and the 18 authorities in charge of each accredited nonpublic school shall 19 do all of the following: 20 1. Assist the department of health and human services in the 21 administration of the Iowa youth survey described in section 22 135.11, subsection 24. 23 2. Report the results of the administration of the Iowa 24 youth survey to the department of education and the department 25 of health and human services. The report shall not contain any 26 personally identifiable information related to any student. 27 Sec. 6. REPEAL. Section 279.79, Code 2025, is repealed. 28